Utah statutes.
53A-3-503.   Criminal trespass upon school property -- Penalty.
(1)  A person is guilty of criminal trespass upon school property if the
person does the following:
(a)  enters or remains unlawfully upon school property, and:
(i)  intends to cause annoyance or injury to a person or damage to property on
the school property;
(ii)  intends to commit a crime; or
(iii)  is reckless as to whether the person's presence will cause fear for the
safety of another; or
(b)  enters or remains without authorization upon school property if notice
against entry or remaining has been given by:
(i)  personal communication to the person by a school official or an
individual with apparent authority to act for a school official;
(ii)  the posting of signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of
trespassers;
(iii)  fencing or other enclosure obviously designed to exclude trespassers;
or
(iv)  a current order of suspension or expulsion.
(2)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Enter" means intrusion of the entire body.
(b)  "School official" means a public or private school administrator or
person in charge of a school program or activity.
(c)  "School property" means real property owned or occupied by a public or
private school, including real property temporarily occupied for a school
activity or program.
(3)  Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
